Hawaii statutes.
C.
Supplementary Programs

§302A-401 Dual credit program.
(a) There is created in the department the dual credit program to permit
eligible students to enroll in any qualified course offered by the University
of Hawaii system.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

"Eligible student" means a public
high school student in the ninth, tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade who:

(1) Has passed an assessment approved by the college
that demonstrates the student's ability to succeed at the college level;

(2) Is under the age of twenty-one as of
September 1 of the school year in which the college course is taken; and

(3) Has other qualifications deemed appropriate by
the department of education or the University of Hawaii; provided that
subsequent qualifications do not restrict any student from taking the
assessment.

"Qualified course" means any
vocational or academic course offered by the University of Hawaii system that
also applies to the department's graduation requirements or is otherwise
permitted by department rule or policy.

(c) All course credits successfully completed
pursuant to this section that would otherwise be transferable but for a
student's grade level, shall be transferable to any University of Hawaii system
degree granting institution; provided that the student is admitted to the
campus where the credit is transferred.

(d) One hundred level or above University of
Hawaii courses that fulfill an undergraduate or graduate degree course
requirement and that are successfully completed under this section shall also
satisfy the department's graduation requirements as determined by the
department pursuant to rule.

(e) This section shall not preclude the
department and the University of Hawaii from establishing programs by mutual
agreement that permit high school students to enroll in college courses. [L
1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 236, §2; am L 2004, c 222, §1; am L 2007, c
282, §2; am L 2015, c 113, §2]

Cross References

Running start program, see §304A-803.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next